Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.846

Partner—Dissent—Voting restriction.

A partner who is entitled to vote on or approve the plan of merger and who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must not vote in favor of or approve the plan of merger. A partner who does not satisfy the requirements of this section is not entitled to payment for the partner's interest under this article.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1204.]